hu_hu.dict
ötvenhármak/Ibh)
ólomnehezek/n×ÓI)
tizennyolcezrek/Ib)
tizenhatezrek/Ib)
odvak/Inxş)
nyolcvannyolcezrek/Ib)
nyolcvanhatezrek/Ib)
nehezek/n×ÓI)
negyvenháromezrek/Ib)
léptek/Ix)	
kilencvennégyezrek/Ib)
kilencvenhetek/Ibh)
kettőezrek/Ib)
háromszázezrek/I)
huszonkilencezrek/Ib)
huszadikak/nI)
hetvenháromezrek/Ib)
hatvannégyezrek/Ib)
hatvanhetek/Ibh)
hatezrek/Iba)
harmincháromezrek/Ib)
hamvak/Inxş)
darvak/Inx)
üzletfelek/IóÍžĆćşx)
ütőkövek/IóÍžĆćşx)
űrszemetek/IóÍžĆćşx)
úszótalpak/IóÍžĆćşx)
összforgalmak/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
ördögharaptafüvek/IóÍžĆćşx)
ökörnyálak/IóÍžĆćşx)
őslovak/IóÍžĆćşx)
óriáskerekek/IóÍžĆćşx)
írósvajak/IóÍžĆćşx)
északvonalak/IóÍžĆćşx)
építőkövek/IóÍžĆćşx)
ékhornyok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
átkok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
árterek/IóÍžĆćşx)
álszemérmek/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
állábak/IóÍžĆćşx)
álhajak/IóÍžĆćşx)
Ásotthalmok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
zárótüzek/IóÍžĆćşx)
zsírkövek/IóÍžĆćşx)
vörösrezek/IóÍžĆćşx)
vízsugarak/IóÍžĆćşx)
vízgyűjtőgödrök/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
vérontófüvek/IóÍžĆćşx)
védőszárnyak/IóÍžĆćşx)
vázak/IóÍžĆćşx)
vámzárak/IóÍžĆćşx)
válaszfalak/IóÍžĆćşx)
vonatutak/IóÍžĆćşx)
viszonvádak/IóÍžĆćşx)
virágcsokrok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
viaszosvásznak/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
vesekövek/IóÍžĆćşx)
vendégházak/IóÍžĆćşx)
vasgyárak/IóÍžĆćşx)
vakbelek/IóÍžĆćşx)
utószelek/IóÍžĆćşx)
uradalmak/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
tülkök/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
túlhatalmak/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
tőkehalak/IóÍžĆćşx)
társak/IóÍžĆćşx)
táncházak/IóÍžĆćşx)
tudásvágyak/IóÍžĆćşx)
torkok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
titkok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
tetőcserepek/IóÍžĆćşx)
terelőutak/IóÍžĆćşx)
tengericsövek/IóÍžĆćşx)
telekárak/IóÍžĆćşx)
tegzek/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
tartalmak/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
tanulmányutak/IóÍžĆćşx)
súrlókövek/IóÍžĆćşx)
sósavak/IóÍžĆćşx)
sétautak/IóÍžĆćşx)
sálak/IóÍžĆćşx)
szótövek/IóÍžĆćşx)
szítóvasak/IóÍžĆćşx)
szépirodalmak/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
szárnyak/IóÍžĆćşx)
szulfonsavak/IóÍžĆćşx)
szifoncsövek/IóÍžĆćşx)
szennyirodalmak/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
szelepzárak/IóÍžĆćşx)
szappanfüvek/IóÍžĆćşx)
sugárhajtóművek/IóÍžĆćşx)
siralmak/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
sarokvasak/IóÍžĆćşx)
rétegvizek/IóÍžĆćşx)
rosszházak/IóÍžĆćşx)
rejtelmek/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
pótkerekek/IóÍžĆćşx)
pálhalevelek/IóÍžĆćşx)
ponyvairodalmak/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
pipaszárak/IóÍžĆćşx)
peckek/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
ostorszíjak/IóÍžĆćşx)
oltalmak/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
nőszőfüvek/IóÍžĆćşx)
nyájak/IóÍžĆćşx)
nyerscukrok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
negyedfelek/IóÍžĆćşx)
nagykereskedelmek/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
műtermek/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
műbelek/IóÍžĆćşx)
mélytengerfenekek/IóÍžĆćşx)
mozivásznak/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
metszővonalak/IóÍžĆćşx)
mennykövek/IóÍžĆćşx)
medrek/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
magánkórházak/IóÍžĆćşx)
lövészgödrök/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
légiterek/IóÍžĆćşx)
lábszárak/IóÍžĆćşx)
levéldarazsak/IóÍžĆćşx)
legek/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
külkereskedelmek/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
kötőszavak/IóÍžĆćşx)
könnyűvizek/IóÍžĆćşx)
kőolajárak/IóÍžĆćşx)
kígyófüvek/IóÍžĆćşx)
kénkövek/IóÍžĆćşx)
kurvaházak/IóÍžĆćşx)
kozáklovak/IóÍžĆćşx)
kollégaurak/wIóÍžĆćşx)
kistermek/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
kisdolgok/IóÍžĆćşx)
keserűgyökerek/IóÍžĆćşx)
kenyereskosarak/IóÍžĆćşx)
katicabogarak/IóÍžĆćşx)
kapocsvasak/IóÍžĆćşx)
kakaslábfüvek/IóÍžĆćşx)
jutalomutak/IóÍžĆćşx)
jajszavak/IóÍžĆćşx)
iparágak/IóÍžĆćşx)
igásökrök/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
hődíjak/IóÍžĆćşx)
házinyulak/IóÍžĆćşx)
hurkok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
holtágak/IóÍžĆćşx)
hexuronsavak/IóÍžĆćşx)
havak/IóÍžĆćşx)
harangtornyok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
hajókötelek/IóÍžĆćşx)
hadikórházak/IóÍžĆćşx)
gépjárművek/IóÍžĆćşx)
gyűrűsmalmok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
gyászleplek/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
gyermekágyak/IóÍžĆćşx)
ginszenggyökerek/IóÍžĆćşx)
fűtőművek/IóÍžĆćşx)
főuralmak/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
főerek/IóÍžĆćşx)
félelmek/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
foszforossavak/IóÍžĆćşx)
fogművek/IóÍžĆćşx)
fiatalurak/IóÍžĆćşx)
felházak/IóÍžĆćşx)
fegyvertermek/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
farkasétvágyak/IóÍžĆćşx)
ezüstlakodalmak/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
enyvesszegfüvek/IóÍžĆćşx)
ellenszelek/IóÍžĆćşx)
ebnyelvfüvek/IóÍžĆćşx)
drótkapcsok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
differenciálművek/IóÍžĆćşx)
címoldalak/IóÍžĆćşx)
csípővasak/IóÍžĆćşx)
cseretárgyak/IóÍžĆćşx)
csalimadarak/IóÍžĆćşx)
ceruzabelek/IóÍžĆćşx)
bölcselmek/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
bábszínházak/IóÍžĆćşx)
borsfüvek/IóÍžĆćşx)
bodrok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
benzilsavak/IóÍžĆćşx)
barkácsáruházak/IóÍžĆćşx)
bakfüvek/IóÍžĆćşx)
aranyhalak/IóÍžĆćşx)
aloldalak/IóÍžĆćşx)
alagcsövek/IóÍžĆćşx)
agarak/IóÍžĆćşx)
Kéleshalmok/IóÍžJĆćş´x)
